Washington statutes.
RCW 36.35.160

Quieting title to tax-title property.

In any and all instances in this state in which a treasurer's deed to real property has been or shall be issued to the county in proceedings to foreclose the lien of general taxes, and for any reason a defect in title exists or adverse claims against the same have not been legally determined, the county or its successors in interest or assigns shall have authority to institute an action in the superior court in the county to correct such defects, and to determine such adverse claims and the priority thereof as provided in RCW 36.35.160 through 36.35.270.

[ 1998 c 106 s 15; 1961 c 15 s 84.64.330. Prior: 1931 c 83 s 1; 1925 ex.s. c 171 s 1; RRS s 11308-1. Formerly RCW 84.64.330.]